Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201785-933
Expenditures in conflict with role and mission assignments; prohibited.

No funds generated or received from a General Fund appropriation, state aid assistance program, or receipts from a tax levy authorized by statute shall be expended in support of programs or activities which are in conflict with the role and mission assignments applicable to the University of Nebraska, state colleges, or community colleges under sections 85-194, 85-308, 85-606.01, 85-917 to 85-966, and 85-1511.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 17;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 261;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1081;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 26.